New York, session 2025-2026, S58.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 490.21 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 490.21 Making a terroristic threat against a police officer. 4 1. A person is guilty of making a terroristic threat against a police 5 officer when with intent to intimidate or coerce a civilian population, 6 influence the policy of a unit of government by intimidation or coer- 7 cion, or affect the conduct of a unit of government by murder, assassi- 8 nation or kidnapping, such person threatens to commit or cause to be 9 committed a specified offense against a police officer and thereby caus- 10 es a reasonable expectation or fear of the imminent commission of such 11 offense against a police officer. 12 2. It shall be no defense to a prosecution pursuant to this section 13 that the defendant did not have the intent or capability of committing 14 the specified offense or that the threat was not made to a person who 15 was a subject thereof. 16 Making a terroristic threat against a police officer is a class C 17 felony. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 19 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00333-01-5